Georgia statutes. 
Revenue bonds must be issued to pay for a definite undertaking, reasonable details of which must be contemplated, chosen, and planned by the governing body of the municipality. It is not absolutely necessary that an intricate and detailed set of plans be incorporated in the resolution but enough facts concerning the proposed project or improvement must appear to afford a key from which the full picture of the project or improvement may be ascertained, such as, for example, a reference to reasonably specific plans, maps, and specifications or their equivalent. Miller v. State, 83 Ga. App. 135, 62 S.E.2d 921 (1951).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 148 et seq.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2168 et seq.

ALR. - Provision in statute or ordinance limiting rate of interest per annum as precluding requirement of payment at maximum rate at intervals of less than a year, 29 A.L.R. 1109.

Power and discretion of officer or board authorized to issue bonds of governmental unit as regards terms or conditions to be included therein, 119 A.L.R. 190.

Sale of municipal or other public bonds at less than par or face value, 162 A.L.R. 396.

36-82-65. Covenants in resolution authorizing issuance of bonds; article and resolution as enforceable contract with bondholders.

Statute text

(a) Any resolution or resolutions authorizing the issuance of bonds under this article to finance, in whole or in part, the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of an undertaking may contain covenants, notwithstanding that such covenants may limit the exercise of powers conferred by this article, as to:

(1) The rates, fees, tolls, or charges to be charged for the services, facilities, and commodities of the undertaking;

(2) The use and disposition of the revenue of the undertaking;

(3) The creation and maintenance of reserves or sinking funds and the regulation, use, and disposition thereof;

(4) The purpose or purposes to which the proceeds of the sale of such bonds may be applied and the use and disposition of such proceeds;

(5) Events of default and the rights and liabilities arising thereupon, the terms and conditions upon which bonds issued under this article shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

(6) A fair and reasonable payment by the governmental body to the account of the undertaking for the services, facilities, or commodities furnished such governmental body or any of its departments by the undertaking;

(7) The issuance of other or additional bonds or instruments payable from or a charge against the revenue of the undertaking;

(8) The insurance to be carried thereon and the use and disposition of insurance moneys;

(9) Books of account and the inspection and audit thereof;

(10) Limitations or restrictions as to the leasing or other disposition of the undertaking while any of the bonds or the interest thereon remains outstanding and unpaid; and

(11) The continuous operation and maintenance of the undertaking.

(b) The provisions of this article and of any such resolution or resolutions shall be a contract with every holder of such bonds; and the duties of the governmental body, the governing body, and the officers of the governmental body under this article and under any such resolution or resolutions shall be enforceable by any bondholder by mandamus or other appropriate action or proceeding at law or in equity.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 6; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For comment on Smith v. Hospital Auth., 210 Ga. 801, 82 S.E.2d 827 (1954), see 17 Ga. B. J. 258 (1954).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Proceeds of bonds constitute trust fund. - When revenue anticipation bonds are provided for and validated for a particular purpose, the proceeds thereof constitute a trust fund which cannot be diverted from such purpose and applied to some other purpose. Smith v. Hospital Auth., 210 Ga. 801, 82 S.E.2d 827 (1954), for comment, see 17 Ga. B. J. 258 (1954).

Covenants against disposing of undertaking enforceable. - Covenants against leasing or otherwise disposing of an undertaking, revenues of which are pledged in accordance with the contract between a governing authority and the authority's bondholders under the Revenue Bond Law (O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36), constitute a contract between such governing body and each bondholder which is enforceable by the latter under the provisions of this section. Hicks v. State, 99 Ga. App. 302, 108 S.E.2d 187 (1959).

Cited in Miller v. Head, 186 Ga. 694, 198 S.E. 680 (1938); Johnson v. State, 107 Ga. App. 16, 128 S.E.2d 651 (1962).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2135, 2136, 2184 et seq.

36-82-66. Governmental liability for payment of bonds; recitation on bond.

Statute text

Revenue bonds issued under this article shall not be payable from or charged upon any funds other than the revenue pledged to the payment thereof, nor shall the governmental body issuing the same be subject to any pecuniary liability thereon. No holder or holders of any such bonds shall ever have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the governmental body to pay any such bonds or the interest thereon, nor to enforce payment thereof against any property of the governmental body; nor shall any such bonds constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance, legal or equitable, upon any property of the governmental body. Every bond issued under this article shall contain a recital setting forth the substance of this Code section.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 7.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For note, "If You (Pay To) Build It, They Will Come: Rethinking Publicly-Financed Professional Sports Stadiums after the Atlanta Braves Deal with Cobb County," see 53 Ga. L. Rev. 409 (2018).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Bonds not debts within constitutional limitations. - Revenue anticipation bonds issued under the Revenue Bond Law (see O.C.G.A. Art. 3, Ch. 82, T. 36) do not subject the political subdivision issuing the bonds to any pecuniary liability thereon and are therefore not debts against such political subdivision within the meaning of the constitutional provision limiting such indebtedness. Fort Oglethorpe v. Catoosa County, 80 Ga. App. 188, 55 S.E.2d 753 (1949).

Contract between county and airport authority. - Even though, under a contract between county and airport authority for use by the county of an expanded airport facility, the consideration to be paid by the county was not expressed in terms of a definite dollar amount, it was not an unconstitutional "new debt". The contract was a valid intergovernmental contract and the consideration represented the authority's lawful "revenue pledged to the payment of" the bonds. Clayton County Airport Auth. v. State, 265 Ga. 24, 453 S.E.2d 8 (1995).

County was authorized to pledge its taxing authority as security for its obligation to pay for the use of an expanded airport facility under a contract between the county and an airport authority and it was error to deny validation of the authority's revenue bonds on the basis of the county's pledge. Clayton County Airport Auth. v. State, 265 Ga. 24, 453 S.E.2d 8 (1995).

Under a contract between county and airport authority for use by the county of an expanded airport facility, although the county's consideration would not be paid directly to the authority, but paid to the custodian of the authority's sinking fund, the consideration did not lose the consideration's character as "revenue" for the authority and such payment scheme was not a reason to deny validation of the authority's revenue bonds. Clayton County Airport Auth. v. State, 265 Ga. 24, 453 S.E.2d 8 (1995).

Development authority not required to own or operate project. - Proposed bond transaction did not violate Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. I and O.C.G.A. § 36-82-66 of the Revenue Bond Law merely because the development authority would not own or operate the proposed stadium; the development authority could use bond proceeds for paying all or part of the cost of any project (O.C.G.A. § 36-62-6(a)(13)), not only those projects the authority developed, and the authority could pay the costs of another government entity's project pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-62-9. Cottrell v. Atlanta Dev. Auth., 297 Ga. 1, 770 S.E.2d 616 (2015).

Cited in Miller v. Head, 186 Ga. 694, 198 S.E. 680 (1938); Stephenson v. State, 219 Ga. 652, 135 S.E.2d 380 (1964); Hospital Auth. v. Stewart, 226 Ga. 530, 175 S.E.2d 857 (1970).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 209 et seq.

ALR. - Estoppel by recitals in municipal bonds as to lawfulness of issue, 86 A.L.R. 1057; 158 A.L.R. 938.

Subsequent issue of bonds by public body as impairing obligation to prior creditors, 87 A.L.R. 397.

Right of creditor of public body to full or pro rata payment when fund out of which obligation is payable is insufficient to pay all like obligations of equal dignity, 90 A.L.R. 717; 171 A.L.R. 1033.

Validity of municipal bond issue as against owners of property annexation of which to municipality became effective after date of election at which issue was approved by voters, 10 A.L.R.2d 559.

When limitations begin to run against actions on public securities or obligations to be paid out of special or particular fund, 50 A.L.R.2d 271.

36-82-67. Right of bondholder or trustee to apply for receivership upon default in payment on bond; procedure for appointment.

Statute text

In the event that the governmental body defaults in the payment of the principal or interest on any of the revenue bonds after the same becomes due, whether at maturity or upon call for redemption, and that such default continues for a period of 30 days or in the event that the governmental body or the governing body or the officers, agents, or employees thereof fail or refuse to comply with the essential provisions of this article or default in any material respect in any agreement made with the holders of the revenue bonds, any holders of revenue bonds or any trustee therefor shall have the right to apply in an appropriate judicial proceeding to the superior court of the county in which the governmental body is located or to any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a receiver of the undertaking, whether or not all revenue bonds have been declared due and payable and whether or not such holder or trustee therefor is seeking or has sought to enforce any other right or to exercise any remedy in connection with such revenue bonds. Upon such application, the superior court, if it deems such action necessary for the protection of the bondholders, may appoint and, if the application is made by the holders of 25 percent in principal amount of such revenue bonds then outstanding or by any trustee for holders of such revenue bonds in such principal amount, shall appoint a receiver of the undertaking.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 8.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Cited in Hicks v. State, 99 Ga. App. 302, 108 S.E.2d 187 (1959).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 75 C.J.S., Receivers, § 1 et seq.

36-82-68. Powers and duties of receiver generally.

Statute text

(a) The receiver appointed under Code Section 36-82-67, directly or by his agents and attorneys, shall forthwith enter into and upon and take possession of the undertaking and each and every part thereof. If the court so directs, the receiver may exclude the governmental body, its governing body, officers, agents, and employees, and all persons claiming under them wholly therefrom. The receiver shall have, hold, use, operate, manage, and control the same and each and every part thereof, in the name of the governmental body or otherwise, as the receiver may deem best. He shall exercise all the rights and powers of the governmental body with respect to the undertaking as the governmental body itself might do. The receiver shall maintain, restore, insure, and keep insured the undertaking and from time to time shall make all such necessary or proper repairs as to the receiver may seem expedient. He shall establish, levy, maintain, and collect such fees, tolls, rentals, and other charges in connection with the undertaking as he deems necessary or proper and reasonable. He shall collect and receive all revenues and shall deposit the same in a separate account and apply the revenues so collected and received in such manner as the court shall direct.

(b) If the undertaking involves parking meters, the control and operation thereof shall remain in the governmental body and the authority of the receiver appointed under Code Section 36-82-67 shall be limited to the right of receiving only the receipts from the parking meters.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 8; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 489, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Cited in Hicks v. State, 99 Ga. App. 302, 108 S.E.2d 187 (1959).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 65 Am. Jur. 2d, Receivers, §§ 133, 134, 136.

C.J.S. - 75 C.J.S., Receivers, §§ 126 et seq., 168.

36-82-69. Limitations on authority of receiver and supervising court.

Statute text

Notwithstanding anything in Code Sections 36-82-67 and 36-82-68, this Code section, and Code Sections 36-82-70 through 36-82-72 to the contrary, the receiver appointed under Code Section 36-82-67 shall have no power to sell, assign, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of any assets of whatever kind or character belonging to the governmental body and useful for the undertaking. The authority of any such receiver shall be limited to the operation and maintenance of the undertaking. No court shall have jurisdiction to enter any order or decree requiring or permitting the receiver to sell, assign, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of any such assets.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 8; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Cited in Hospital Auth. v. Stewart, 226 Ga. 530, 175 S.E.2d 857 (1970).

36-82-70. Supervision of receiver by court.

Statute text

The receiver appointed under Code Section 36-82-67 shall, in the performance of the powers conferred upon him, act under the direction and supervision of the court making such appointment and shall at all times be subject to the orders and decrees of such court and may be removed thereby. Nothing contained in Code Sections 36-82-67 through 36-82-69, this Code section, and Code Sections 36-82-71 and 36-82-72 shall limit or restrict the jurisdiction of such court to enter such other and further orders and decrees as such court may deem necessary or appropriate for the exercise by the receiver of any functions specifically set forth in Code Sections 36-82-67 through 36-82-69, this Code section, and Code Sections 36-82-71 and 36-82-72.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 8; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 65 Am. Jur. 2d, Receivers, § 135.

C.J.S. - 75 C.J.S., Receivers, § 46.

36-82-71. Surrender of receivership upon cure of default.

Statute text

Whenever all that is due upon the revenue bonds and interest thereon and upon any other notes, bonds, or other obligations and interest thereon having a charge, lien, or encumbrance on the revenues of the undertaking and under any of the terms of any covenants or agreements with holders of revenue bonds has been paid or deposited as provided therein and all defaults have been cured and made good and it appears to the court that no default is imminent, the court shall direct the receiver to surrender possession of the undertaking to the governmental body. The same right of the holders of the revenue bonds to secure the appointment of a receiver shall exist upon any subsequent default as is provided in Code Section 36-82-67.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 8.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 65 Am. Jur. 2d, Receivers, § 145 et seq.

36-82-72. Construction of Code Sections 36-82-67 through 36-82-71 and this Code section.

Statute text

If any part or portion of Code Sections 36-82-67 through 36-82-71 and this Code section is held by any court of competent jurisdiction to create a debt of a governmental body or to be unenforceable or ineffective, the remaining parts and portions thereof shall not be affected thereby in any way, but the part or portion so held unenforceable and ineffective shall be severed and rescinded from this article. The intention of the General Assembly not to permit any governmental body to be deprived of its property or to be susceptible or liable to forfeiture shall be controlling.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 8; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 36.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

36-82-73. Proceedings for validation of revenue bonds generally.

Statute text

All revenue bonds issued under this article shall be validated in the superior court in the manner set forth in Code Sections 36-82-74 through 36-82-83.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 9; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For note, "If You (Pay To) Build It, They Will Come: Rethinking Publicly-Financed Professional Sports Stadiums after the Atlanta Braves Deal with Cobb County," see 53 Ga. L. Rev. 409 (2018).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

36-82-74. Notice to district attorney or Attorney General of resolution authorizing revenue bonds.

Statute text

When any governmental body desires to issue revenue bonds under this article, the officer or officers of such governmental body, within six months after the passage of the resolution authorizing the bonds, shall, in writing, notify the district attorney of the judicial circuit in which the governmental body is located of the fact that such resolution has been passed by the governing body and of the intention of the governmental body to issue such bonds. The service of notice shall be personal upon the district attorney and shall be accompanied by a certified copy of the resolution of the governing body of the governmental body authorizing the bonds. If the district attorney is absent from the circuit, such notice shall be served in person upon the Attorney General.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 10; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Effect of failure of solicitor general (now district attorney) to file petition. - When the solicitor general (now district attorney), or the Attorney General, fails to file a validation petition within the 20-day period, any petition filed, without a prior order of court directing such filing, is a nullity. State v. Smallwood, 103 Ga. App. 400, 119 S.E.2d 297 (1961).

State a necessary party in intervention in validation proceeding. - On appeal by intervening taxpayers and citizens from a judgment of the superior court overruling their objections and validating the bonds, the state is a necessary and indispensable party, and, it appearing that the state had not been made a party to the bill of exceptions or served with a copy of the bill of exceptions, the writ of error is properly dismissed. Darby v. City of Vidalia, 75 Ga. App. 804, 44 S.E.2d 454 (1947).

Memorandum of agreement establishing valuation method part of lease agreement. - Because a memorandum of agreement establishing the valuation methodology to be used in assessing ad valorem taxes on a leasehold estate was referenced by the lease and dictated the methodology to be used to value a corporation's leasehold estate for ad valorem tax purposes, it constituted an integral part of the lease agreement and was properly before the trial court; in a transaction in which revenue bonds will be paid through lease proceeds, all agreements relating to the lease are properly within the trial court's jurisdiction. Sherman v. Dev. Auth., 317 Ga. App. 345, 730 S.E.2d 113 (2012).

Cited in Dade County v. State, 77 Ga. App. 139, 48 S.E.2d 144 (1948).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, §§ 352, 353.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2135, 2136, 2139 et seq.

36-82-75. Duty of district attorney or Attorney General to file petition; order to show cause; service of petition and order; answer.

Statute text

Within 20 days from the date of service of the notice provided for in Code Section 36-82-74, the district attorney or the Attorney General shall prepare and file, in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county issuing the bonds or of the county in which the governmental body is located, a petition directed to the superior court of such county in the name of the state and against the governmental body desiring to issue the revenue bonds. The petition shall set forth service of the notice, the name of the governmental body seeking to issue the bonds, the amount of bonds to be issued, for what purpose the bonds are to be issued, what interest they are to bear, how much principal and interest is to be paid annually, when the bonds are to be paid in full, and the security to be pledged to the payment of the bonds; provided, however, the petition may provide for a maximum interest rate and a maximum annual principal and interest payment. The district attorney or the Attorney General shall obtain from the judge of the court an order requiring the governmental body by its proper officers to show cause, at such time and place, either in term or chambers, within 20 days from the filing of the petition, as the judge may direct, why the bonds and the security for the payment thereof should not be confirmed and validated. The petition and order shall be served in the manner now provided by law for the service of petitions upon counties, governmental bodies, or political subdivisions. The officers of the governmental body shall make sworn answers to the petition within the time prescribed.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 11; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1103, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Effect of failure of solicitor general (now district attorney) to file petition. - When the solicitor general (now district attorney), or the Attorney General, fails to file a validation petition within the 20-day period, any petition filed, without a prior order of court directing such filing, is a nullity. State v. Smallwood, 103 Ga. App. 400, 119 S.E.2d 297 (1961).

Petition sets forth interest rate with reasonable specificity under the circumstances when the petition states the interest rate "will not exceed 103/4%" and there was testimony at the validation hearing that the interest rate will be set at the time of closing. Alexander v. Macon-Bibb County Urban Dev. Auth. & Urban Properties #47, 257 Ga. 181, 357 S.E.2d 62 (1987).

Citizens of municipality have right to object to validation of revenue bonds on grounds that project is unreasonable or unsound. Miller v. State, 83 Ga. App. 135, 62 S.E.2d 921 (1951).

State a necessary party in intervention in validation proceeding. - On appeal by intervening taxpayers and citizens from a judgment of the superior court overruling their objections and validating the bonds, the state is a necessary and indispensable party, and, it appearing that the state had not been made a party to the bill of exceptions or served with a copy of the bill of exceptions, the writ of error is properly dismissed. Darby v. City of Vidalia, 75 Ga. App. 804, 44 S.E.2d 454 (1947).

Burden of making out case is on state. - State is a necessary and indispensable party to an action to require validation of water and sewer revenue anticipation bonds as the express provisions of this section require that the action be brought in its name. The burden of making out the state's case for the validation of the revenue anticipation bonds was upon the state. Darby v. City of Vidalia, 75 Ga. App. 804, 44 S.E.2d 454 (1947).

Bond validation. - Trial court orders validating the bonds for all three portions of a county project were upheld because the challengers cited no deficiencies that the county did not comply with O.C.G.A. § 36-82-75, the county provided unrebutted testimony that the office, hotel, and retail projects would provide economic benefits to the county and state, and that issuance of the bonds was in the public interest and, thus, qualified as projects within the meaning of O.C.G.A. § 36-62-2(6)(N). Long v. Development Authority of Fulton County, 352 Ga. App. 815, 835 S.E.2d 717 (2019).

Georgia Court of Appeals held that under the plain language of O.C.G.A. § 36-62-2, a development authority was authorized by the statute's catchall provision of paragraph (6)(N) to pursue an office project, but only if the project meets that subsection's requirement that a majority of the members of the authority determines and adopts a resolution that the office project would further the public purpose of the law. Long v. Development Authority of Fulton County, 352 Ga. App. 815, 835 S.E.2d 717 (2019).

Cited in Gibbs v. City of Social Circle, 191 Ga. 422, 12 S.E.2d 335 (1940); Dade County v. State, 77 Ga. App. 139, 48 S.E.2d 144 (1948); Rich v. State, 237 Ga. 291, 227 S.E.2d 761 (1976); Nations v. Downtown Dev. Auth., 255 Ga. 324, 338 S.E.2d 240 (1985); Hay v. Newton County, 246 Ga. App. 44, 538 S.E.2d 181 (2000); Citizens for Ethics in Gov't, LLC v. Atlanta Dev. Auth., 303 Ga. App. 724, 694 S.E.2d 680 (2010), cert. denied, No. S10C1350, 2010 Ga. LEXIS 722 (Ga. 2010).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 353 et seq.

36-82-76. Notice of hearing on validation.

Statute text

Prior to the hearing of the case, the clerk of the superior court of the county in which it is to be heard shall publish, once during each of the two successive weeks immediately preceding the week in which the hearing is to be held, a notice to the public that on the day specified in the order providing for the hearing of the case the same will be heard. Such publication shall be in the newspaper which is the official organ of the county in which the sheriff's advertisements appear.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 12; Ga. L. 1966, p. 48, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For note, "Procedural requirements for public approval of tax-exempt industrial development bonds under TEFRA", 19 Ga. St. B. J. 84 (1982).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Notice sufficient. - Although a scrivener's error stated that the hearing would regard the validation of a bond issued by the county industrial building authority, because the notice made clear that it was meant to refer to a case involving the airport authority, not the industrial building authority, the notice of the bond validation hearing was sufficient as the record supported a finding of substantial compliance. Avery v. State of Ga., 295 Ga. 630, 761 S.E.2d 56 (2014).

Cited in Darby v. City of Vidalia, 75 Ga. App. 804, 44 S.E.2d 454 (1947); Dade County v. State, 77 Ga. App. 139, 48 S.E.2d 144 (1948); Youngblood v. State, 259 Ga. 864, 388 S.E.2d 671 (1990).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 357.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2135, 2136, 2139 et seq.

36-82-77. Hearing and judgment on validation; parties to proceedings; right of appeal; review of valuation of existing undertakings.

Statute text

(a) Within the time prescribed in the order or such further time as he may fix, the judge of the superior court shall proceed to hear and determine all questions of law and of fact in the case and shall render judgment thereof. Any citizen of this state who is a resident of the governmental body which desires to issue such bonds may become a party to the proceedings at or before the time set for the hearing and any party thereto who is dissatisfied with the judgment of the court confirming and validating the issuance of the bonds or refusing to confirm and validate the issuance of the bonds and the security therefor may appeal from the judgment under the procedure provided by law in cases of injunction. Only a party to the proceedings at the time the judgment appealed from is rendered may appeal from such judgment.

(b) Whenever any governmental body values existing undertakings as permitted by law in connection with the issuance of bonds, the superior courts may review such action, which review shall be had in the proceedings to validate the revenue bonds.

History

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 761, § 13; Ga. L. 1939, p. 362, § 3; Ga. L. 1966, p. 48, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For note, "If You (Pay To) Build It, They Will Come: Rethinking Publicly-Financed Professional Sports Stadiums after the Atlanta Braves Deal with Cobb County," see 53 Ga. L. Rev. 409 (2018).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - See Lawson v. City of Moultrie, 194 Ga. 699, 22 S.E.2d 592 (1942).

Duty of trial court to review soundness of venture. - It is the duty of the trial court on the hearing of an application to validate revenue anticipation bonds to determine from the evidence the fact of whether or not the venture is sound, feasible, and reasonable, and not to review the discretion of the municipal authorities in proposing the venture. Carter v. State, 93 Ga. App. 12, 90 S.E.2d 672 (1955).

Generally, there can be but one action to validate either certificates or bonds; in either case all interventions would be heard in the validation proceedings, and the allegation that a declaratory judgment is necessary to avoid a multiplicity of actions is a conclusion of the pleader, contrary to the statutory provisions pertaining to validation of revenue anticipation bonds. Liner v. City of Rossville, 212 Ga. 664, 94 S.E.2d 862 (1956).

This section authorizes intervention of "any citizen of this state, resident of such municipality" in any proceeding to validate revenue anticipation bonds. Liner v. City of Rossville, 212 Ga. 664, 94 S.E.2d 862 (1956).

Standing to challenge bond validation. - Appeal filed by challengers to a trial court judgment confirming and validating a city's bond issuance was dismissed because the challengers failed to present any evidence to establish the challengers standing under O.C.G.A. § 36-82-77(a) to become parties in the bond validation proceeding; thus, the challengers lacked standing to appeal the judgment in that proceeding. Sherman v. City of Atlanta, 317 Ga. 345, 730 S.E.2d 113 (2013).

Attorney who intervened in a bond validation proceeding pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-82-77(a) and then offered to withdraw the attorney's objections if the developers paid the attorney a substantial amount of money did not violate Ga. St. Bar R. 4-102(d):4.2(a) or Ga. St. Bar. R. 4-102(d):8.4(a)(4) because the attorney's conduct was not fraudulent; a party could intervene for ulterior and personal reasons and still have standing. In the Matter of Woodham, 296 Ga. 618, 769 S.E.2d 353 (2015).

Validity of agreement proper subject for superior court. - Superior court had authority to adjudicate the validity of a Hotel/Motel Tax Operation and Maintenance Agreement for a stadium project even though the agreement did not act as security for the bonds, based on the court's jurisdiction to hear and determine all questions of law and of fact in the bond validation case and render judgment on those issues, pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-82-77. Cottrell v. Atlanta Dev. Auth., 297 Ga. 1, 770 S.E.2d 616 (2015).

No right to jury trial. - Bond validation proceeding is not one of class of cases, either in terms or by analogy, in which jury trials have ever existed as a matter of right; and it does not fall within Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VI, Sec. XVI, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. XI). Steadham v. State, 224 Ga. 78, 159 S.E.2d 397, cert. denied, 393 U.S. 825, 89 S. Ct. 87, 21 L. Ed. 2d 96 (1968).

Sufficiency of information in engineering report. - Information contained in engineering report introduced in evidence met the statutory requirements as to certainty and definiteness, in that it showed with reasonable certainty the nature, kind, and location of the improvements and described and defined with reasonable fullness and definiteness the undertaking including the estimated costs thereof. Carter v. State, 93 Ga. App. 12, 90 S.E.2d 672 (1955).

Burden of making out case on intervenors when stipulations make prima facie case. - When citizens as intervenors file an intervention objecting to the validation of revenue anticipation bonds, the burden is on the plaintiff in the proceeding to make out a prima facie case, but when the parties to such a proceeding by stipulation and other admissions admit sufficient material allegations to make out a prima facie case it is not error for the judge to rule that the burden is upon intervenors to introduce evidence in support of their intervention. Dade County v. State, 77 Ga. App. 139, 48 S.E.2d 144 (1948).

Intervention seeking validation denial for nonconformity with law not subject to dismissal. - Intervention filed by a resident and taxpayer of the municipality proposing to issue revenue bonds which seeks to have the validation denied and the proceedings dismissed because such petition was not filed in conformity with such laws is not subject to demurrer (now motion to dismiss). State v. Smallwood, 103 Ga. App. 400, 119 S.E.2d 297 (1961).

Intervention in bond validation proceeding. - Challenger in an action validating and confirming taxable revenue bonds lacked standing to intervene in the action as a result of failing to comply with the intervention procedures set forth in O.C.G.A. § 9-11-24(c); and, because the challenger lacked standing to become a party in the trial court, the challenger also lacked standing to appeal the trial court's judgment, therefore, the appeal was dismissed. Sherman v. Dev. Auth., 324 Ga. App. 23, 749 S.E.2d 29 (2013).

Exception must be taken to judgment validating revenue anticipation bonds within 20 days from such judgment, and, when the superior court of a county enters an order validating water revenue certificates of a city on February 16, and exception is not taken to such judgment until March 16, (a period of 28 days), the Court of Appeals is without jurisdiction to review that judgment. Drury v. City of Woodbine, 96 Ga. App. 158, 99 S.E.2d 550 (1957).

State a necessary party in intervention in validation proceeding. - On appeal by intervening taxpayers and citizens from a judgment of the superior court overruling their objections and validating the bonds, the state is a necessary and indispensable party, and, it appearing that the state had not been made a party to the bill of exceptions or served with a copy of the bill of exception, the writ of error is properly dismissed. Darby v. City of Vidalia, 75 Ga. App. 804, 44 S.E.2d 454 (1947).

Notice and a hearing required before dismissal of intervention complaints. - Trial court erred in dismissing a complaint by intervenors objecting to a bond validation proceeding without notice and a hearing on the dismissal issue, although the trial court found that the intervenors had intervened for the improper purpose of seeking $ 1.3 million from developers to avoid the litigation. Citizens for Ethics in Gov't, LLC v. Atlanta Dev. Auth., 303 Ga. App. 724, 694 S.E.2d 680 (2010), cert. denied, No. S10C1350, 2010 Ga. LEXIS 722 (Ga. 2010).

When proper issue of fact is raised as to feasibility of plan to validate refunding bonds, it is for the trial court to determine, under the evidence, such issue. Dade County v. State, 75 Ga. App. 330, 43 S.E.2d 434 (1947); Carter v. State, 93 Ga. App. 12, 90 S.E.2d 672 (1955).

Bond approval not proper. - Trial court erred by validating taxable revenue bonds for a county development authority as the order validating the bonds failed to set forth sufficient findings of fact and conclusions of law to support the court's holdings and, thus, failed to satisfy the requirements of O.C.G.A. § 9-11-52(a). Sherman v. Dev. Auth., 320 Ga. App. 689, 740 S.E.2d 663 (2013).

Standard of review. - When the trial court has concluded the project promoted the statutory objectives and there is evidence to support the trial court's decision, the Supreme Court will find no error. Alexander v. Macon-Bibb County Urban Dev. Auth. & Urban Properties #47, 257 Ga. 181, 357 S.E.2d 62 (1987).

Remand to trial court for preparation of findings and conclusions. - Judgment granting the state's petition to validate revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-82-60 et seq., was remanded to the trial court because the trial court failed to mention in the judgment the citizen who intervened in the proceedings and to set forth findings of fact and conclusions of law with respect to various grounds pursued by the citizen as required by O.C.G.A. § 9-11-52(a); prior to the judgment, the citizen requested findings of fact and conclusions of law. Sherman v. Dev. Auth., 314 Ga. App. 237, 723 S.E.2d 528 (2012).

Validation upheld. - After a trial court required two intervenors to post a bond of $625,000 with regard to the intervenors' challenge to the public improvement bond approved by a city's building authority for a sewer project, the trial court properly validated the bond by following all necessary procedural requirements and the bond did not violate Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. V, Para. I(a) since the city's payment for the use of the sewer project was a debt specifically authorized under the constitution pursuant to Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. III, Para. I(a). Berry v. City of E. Point, 277 Ga. App. 649, 627 S.E.2d 391 (2006).

Memorandum of agreement establishing valuation method part of lease agreement. - Because a memorandum of agreement establishing the valuation methodology to be used in assessing ad valorem taxes on a leasehold estate was referenced by the lease and dictated the methodology to be used to value a corporation's leasehold estate for ad valorem tax purposes, it constituted an integral part of the lease agreement and was properly before the trial court; in a transaction in which revenue bonds will be paid through lease proceeds, all agreements relating to the lease are properly within the trial court's jurisdiction. Sherman v. Dev. Auth., 317 Ga. App. 345, 730 S.E.2d 113 (2012).

Cited in Gibbs v. City of Social Circle, 191 Ga. 422, 12 S.E.2d 335 (1940); Mays v. State, 110 Ga. App. 881, 140 S.E.2d 223 (1965); Peagler v. State, 223 Ga. 886, 159 S.E.2d 72 (1968); Nations v. Downtown Dev. Auth., 255 Ga. 324, 338 S.E.2d 240 (1985); Youngblood v. State, 259 Ga. 864, 388 S.E.2d 671 (1990); Dev. Auth. v. State of Ga., 306 Ga. 375, 829 S.E.2d 160 (2019).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, §§ 369, 372.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2139, 2140, 2173.
